Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1210
Department of Health and Human Services; certain foster care children; payment rates; family care services; plan; implementation.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Health and Human Services shall have the authority through rule or regulation to establish payment rates for children with special needs who are in foster care and in the custody of the department.

(2)(a) On or before October 1, 2022, the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care and the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a plan to implement treatment family care services. The plan shall be submitted to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature and the Nebraska Children's Commission.

(b) On or before October 1, 2023, the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care shall implement treatment family care services as allowed by federal law. The department shall seek to maximize federal funding for such program prior to utilizing state medicaid funds for eligible children.

Laws 1990, LB 1022, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 350;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 282;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 17.